src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-taarbshed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - taarbšed: # Verb 'to need/tarvita' - full paradigm
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taarbšam
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: taarbšak
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taarbaš
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: taarbšep
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: taarbšeʹped
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: taarbše
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: taarbšet
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: taarbâž

     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: taarbšem
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: taarbšiǩ
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: taarbši
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: taarbšim
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: taarbšid
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: taarbše
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: taarbšeš
     taarbšed+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: taarbšam

     taarbšed+V+Pot+Sg1: taarbšeʹžem
     taarbšed+V+Pot+Sg2: taarbšeʹžiǩ
     taarbšed+V+Pot+Sg3: taarbšež
     taarbšed+V+Pot+Pl1: taarbšeʹžep
     taarbšed+V+Pot+Pl2: taarbšeʹžid
     taarbšed+V+Pot+Pl3: taarbšeʹže
     taarbšed+V+Pot+Sg4: taarbšeʹžet
     taarbšed+V+Pot+ConNeg: taarbšeʹže

     taarbšed+V+Cond+Sg1: taarbšeʹčem
     taarbšed+V+Cond+Sg2: taarbšeʹčiǩ
     taarbšed+V+Cond+Sg3: taarbšeʹči
     taarbšed+V+Cond+Pl1: [taarbšeʹčim, taarbšeʹčin, taarbšeʹčep]
     taarbšed+V+Cond+Pl2: taarbšeʹčid
     taarbšed+V+Cond+Pl3: taarbšeʹče
     taarbšed+V+Cond+Sg4: taarbšeʹčeš
     taarbšed+V+Cond+ConNeg: taarbšeʹče

     taarbšed+V+Imprt+Sg2: taarbâž
     taarbšed+V+Imprt+Sg3: taarbšââǥǥas
     taarbšed+V+Imprt+Pl1: taarbšâkap
     taarbšed+V+Imprt+Pl2: taarbšeʹǩed
     taarbšed+V+Imprt+Pl3: taarbšâkaz
     taarbšed+V+Imprt+ConNeg: taarbâž
     taarbšed+V+Imprt+ConNegII: taarbšuku
     taarbšed+V+Actio+Ess: taarbšeʹmen
     taarbšed+V+Actio: taarbšam
     taarbšed+V+Act+PrsPrc: taarbšeei
     taarbšed+V+Act+PrfPrc: taarbšam
     taarbšed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [taarbšummu, taarbšuum]
     taarbšed+V+VAbess: taarbšeǩâni

     taarbšed+V+Ger+Ess: taarbšeen
     taarbšed+V+Ger+Instr: taarbšeeʹl
